Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 22
RECYCLING MOTOR VEHICLES

42-4-2201. Definitions.

As used in this part 22, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Auto parts recycler" means any person that purchases motor vehicles for the purpose of dismantling and selling the components thereof and that complies with all federal, state, and local laws and regulations.

"Licensed motor vehicle dealer" means a motor vehicle dealer that is licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44.

"Operator" means a person or a firm licensed by the public utilities commission as a towing carrier.

"Recycling" means:

Crushing or shredding a motor vehicle to produce scrap metal that may be used to produce new products; or

Dismantling a motor vehicle to remove reusable parts prior to recycling the remainder of the vehicle.

"System" means the Colorado motor vehicle verification system created in section 42-4-2203.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 205, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire part amended, p. 1626, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1298), ch. 417, p. 2317, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(2) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 142, § 22, effective October 1.

42-4-2202. Transfer for recycling.

No person who is not a licensed motor vehicle dealer shall purchase or otherwise receive a motor vehicle to recycle the vehicle, unless:

The seller or transferor is the owner on the certificate of title, an operator, or a licensed motor vehicle dealer;

The seller or transferor provides a completed bill of sale on a form prescribed by the department of revenue; or

The receiver or purchaser complies with subsection (2) of this section.

A person other than a licensed motor vehicle dealer who purchases or otherwise receives a motor vehicle for the purpose of recycling the vehicle shall keep the vehicle for seven business days before recycling unless the seller or transferor:

Is the owner on the certificate of title, an operator, or a licensed motor vehicle dealer; or

If the purchaser or transferee is an operator selling an abandoned motor vehicle pursuant to part 18 or 21 of this article or a licensed motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer, provides a completed bill of sale on a form prescribed by the department of revenue.

During the seven-day waiting period:

The motor vehicle, the bill of sale, a copy of the system inquiry results, and, if applicable, the daily record required pursuant to section 42-5-105 shall be open at all times during regular business hours to inspection by the department of revenue or any peace officer; and

The receiver or purchaser shall submit the vehicle identification number to the system.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars for the first offense and one thousand dollars for each subsequent offense.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 205, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire part amended, p. 1627, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-2203. Vehicle verification system - fees - rules.

The Colorado motor vehicle verification system is hereby created within the Colorado bureau of investigation. The system shall be a database system that uses a motor vehicle's vehicle identification number to ascertain whether the motor vehicle has been stolen. The system shall be accessible through the internet by motor vehicle dealers, motor vehicle recyclers, automobile repair shops, licensed tow operators, the department of revenue and its authorized agents, and the general public.

The system shall use the latest information that the department of public safety possesses on stolen motor vehicles.

Users of the system shall pay a fee as established by the department of public safety in an amount necessary to fund the direct and indirect costs of administering the system; except that neither the department of revenue nor its authorized agent shall pay a fee for the use of the system.

The department of public safety may register the persons who use the system and promulgate any rules reasonably necessary to implement the system.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part amended, p. 1627, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1025, § 2, effective August 5.

42-4-2204. Theft discovered - duties - liability.

If a motor vehicle is identified as stolen by the system, the person submitting the inquiry shall report the incident to the nearest law enforcement agency with jurisdiction within one business day.

A person who, acting in good faith, recycles a motor vehicle or reports an incident to a law enforcement agency shall be immune from civil liability and criminal prosecution for such acts if made in reliance on the system. The department of public safety shall not be subject to civil liability for failing to identify a stolen vehicle.

A person who fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section commits a class 3 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished in accordance with section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S. A person who fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section two times within five years commits a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished in accordance with section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S. A person who fails to comply with subsection (1) of this section three or more times within five years commits a class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished in accordance with section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire part amended, p. 1628, § 1, effective July 1.